Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4414
Child welfare system; strategic leadership group; members.

There is hereby established a child welfare strategic leadership group. The strategic leadership group shall be a nonvoting group that exists for purposes of receiving updates on the work group's activities. The strategic leadership group shall consist of:

(1) The chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature;

(2) The chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature;

(3) The Chief Justice or the Chief Justice's designee; and

(4) The chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human Services or such officer's designee.

Laws 2022, LB1173, § 4.